District of Columbia statutes.
25-313

Appropriateness standard.

(a)

To qualify for issuance, renewal of a license, transfer of a license to a new location, or an application for the approval of a substantial change in operation as determined by the Board under § 25-404, an applicant shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Board that the establishment is appropriate for the locality, section, or portion of the District where it is to be located.

(b)

In determining the appropriateness of an establishment, the Board shall consider all relevant evidence of record, including:

(1)

The effect of the establishment on real property values;

(2)

The effect of the establishment on peace, order, and quiet, including the noise and litter provisions set forth in §§ 25-725 and 25-726;

(3)

The effect of the establishment upon residential parking needs and vehicular and pedestrian safety; and

(4)

In the case of a license renewal, the provisions of this subsection and § 25-315.

(c)

(1)

The requirements of this section shall not apply to applicants for a solicitor’s license or a temporary license.

(2)

Applicants for a caterer’s license shall apply according to the procedures under Chapter 20 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations.

(d)

No license shall be issued for an outlet, property, establishment, or business which sells motor vehicle gasoline or which holds a Motor Vehicle Sales, Service, and Repair endorsement under § 47-2851.03(c)(9) [now § 47-2851.03(a)(9)] or an Environmental Materials endorsement under § 47-2851.03(c)(4) [now § 47-2851.03(a)(4)] to its master [basic] business license.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 327, ch. 4, § 14
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 802, 803, ch. 766, §§ 1, 2
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, § 3
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(e), (f)
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 616, Pub. L. 90-450, title IV, § 404
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-146, § 4, 27 DCR 4753
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 8, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(4), (c), 30 DCR 5927
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-97, § 2, 31 DCR 2556
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 9, 34 DCR 907
June 5, 1987, D.C. Law 7-7, § 2, 34 DCR 2640
Oct. 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-174, § 2(b), (c), 39 DCR 5859
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(f), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-39, § 2, 46 DCR 6548
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1702(f), 49 DCR 6968
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 201(a), 51 DCR 6525
This section is referenced in § 25-101, § 25-316, § 25-361, § 25-404, § 25-433, and § 25-446.
1981 Ed., § 25-313.
1973 Ed., § 25-115.
D.C. Law 14-190, in subsec. (a), substituted “, transfer of a license to a new location,” for “, new owner license renewal,”.
D.C. Law 15-187 designated the existing text of subsec. (c) as par. (1); and added par. (2) of subsec. (c).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1702(f) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).